Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2887, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 260, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2887), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2887. The following property shall be exempt from ad
valorem taxation:
1. All property of the United States, and such property as may
be exempt by reason of treaty stipulations existing at statehood
between the Indians and the United States government, or by reason
of federal laws in effect at statehood, during the time such
treaties or federal laws are in force and effect. In instances
Req. No. 14705 Page 1

wher e a federal agency has obtained title to property through
foreclosure, voluntary or involuntary liquidation or bankruptcy,
which was previously subject to ad valorem taxation, the property
may continue to be assessed for ad valorem taxes if such federal
agency has agreed to pay such taxes;
2. All property of this state, and of the counties, school
districts, and municipalities of this state, including property
acquired for the use of such entities pursuant to the terms of a
lease-purchase agreement which provides for the passage of title or
the release of security interest, if applicable, upon payment of all
rental payments and an additional nominal amount;
3. All property of any college or school, provided such
property is devoted exclusively and directly to the appropriate
objects of such college or school within this state and all property
used exclusively for nonprofit schools and colleges;
4. The books, papers, furniture and scientific or other
apparatus pertaining to any institution, college or society referred
to in paragraph 3 of this section, and devoted exclusively and
directly for the purpose above contemplated, and the like property
of students in any such institution or college, while such property
is used for the purpose of their education;
5. All fraternal orphan homes and other orphan homes;
6. All property used for free public libraries, free museums,
public cemeteries, or free public schools;
Req. No. 14705 Page 2

7. All property used exclusively and directly for fraternal or
religious purposes within this state. For purposes of this
paragraph, an exemption based on religious purposes includes real
property owned by a church which allows its premises to be used by
an entity if such entity is not required to make rental payments to
the church, is not required to execute a formal lease agreement with
respect to its occupancy of the church premises and conducts
instruction of children from any or all grades for ages preschool
through twelfth grade, including religious instruction consistent
with the doctrines of the church the premises of which are being
used for that purpose. For purposes of this paragraph, a
requirement by a church to be reimbursed by the entity for utility
expenses, janitorial services or similar expenses shall not be a
basis upon which to remove or deny the exempt status of church
property. Exempt status of church property shall not be removed nor
shall church property be allocated between taxable and exempt status
based on the use of church premises by an entity as described by
this paragraph.
For purposes of administering the exemption authorized by this
section and in order to determine whether a single family
residential property is used exclusively and directly for fraternal
or religious purposes, the fair cash value of a single family
residential property, for which an exemption is claimed as
authorized by this subsection, in excess of Five Hundred Thousand
Req. No. 14705 Page 3

Doll ars ($500,000.00) for the applicable assessment year shall not
be exempt from taxation;
8. All property of any charitable institution entity organized
or chartered under the laws of this state as a nonprofit or
charitable institution entity, provided the net income, or any part
or portion thereof, from such property is used exclusively within
this state for charitable purposes and no part of such income inures
to the benefit of any private stockholder, including property which
is not leased or rented to any person other than a governmental
body, a charitable institution entity or a member of the general
public who is authorized to be a tenant in property owned by a
charitable institution entity under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and which includes but is not limited to an
institution entity that either:
a. additionally satisfies the income standards set forth
in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Procedure 96-32,
which may be audited by the county assessor of the
applicable county, in addition to other requirements
of this subparagraph, as a condition of obtaining and
maintaining the exemption, if:
(1) the property provides residential rental
accommodations regardless of whether services or
meals are provided, and
(2) the property:
Req. No. 14705 Page 4

(a) is occupied as of the applicable January 1
assessment date if the structure is a
single-family dwelling, or
(b) has an average seventy-five percent (75%)
occupancy rate, based upon the total number
of units suitable for occupancy, during the
calendar year preceding the applicable
January 1 assessment date if the property
contains multiple structures suitable for
multi-family housing. The owner of any
property subject to the occupancy
requirements prescribed herein shall submit
a report to the county assessor of the
county in which the property is located no
later than December 15 each year regarding
the occupancy rate for the preceding eleven
(11) months. If the report indicates that
the average occupancy rate was less than
seventy-five percent (75%), the county
assessor shall determine the taxable value
of the property for the succeeding
assessment year and the property shall not
be exempt for any subsequent assessment year
unless the average occupancy rate is at
Req. No. 14705 Page 5

least seventy-five percent (75%) during the
succeeding eleven-month period. Except as
provided in Section 178.6 of Title 60 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, no asset consisting of a
single-family or multi-family dwelling unit
owned by an entity the property of which
would otherwise be exempt pursuant to
subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be
exempt from ad valorem taxation if any such
dwelling unit was improved with or acquired
with any portion of proceeds from the sale
of obligations issued by any entity
organized pursuant to Section 176 of Title
60 of the Oklahoma Statutes if the interest
income derived from such obligations is
exempt from federal income tax, or
(c) the property is constructed, developed or
operated as an affordable housing project
pursuant to this section, the structure of
which is financed, in whole or in part, by
or through the issuance of low income
housing tax credits ("LIHTC"), as authorized
pursuant to the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (P.L.

Req. No. 14705 Page 6

99-514), as may be amended from time to
time,
b. (1) for a facility constructed prior to January 1,
2006, is a continuum of care retirement community
providing housing for the aged, licensed under
Oklahoma law, owned by a nonprofit entity
recognized by the Internal Revenue Service as a
Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity and located
in a county with a population of more than five
hundred thousand (500,000) according to the
latest Federal Decennial Census, and
(2) (a) for a facility in which construction was
completed on or after January 1, 2006, is:
i. a continuum of care retirement
community providing housing for the
aged, licensed under Oklahoma law,
ii. owned by a nonprofit entity recognized
by the Internal Revenue Service as a
Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity,
and
iii. located in any county of the state
regardless of population, or
(b) for a facility other than a facility
described by division (1) of subparagraph b
Req. No. 14705 Page 7

of this paragraph and which is partially or
fully constructed prior to January 1, 2006,
is:
i. owned and occupied on or after January
1, 2006, by an entity that operates a
continuum of care retirement community
providing housing for the aged,
licensed under Oklahoma law,
ii. owned by a nonprofit entity recognized
by the Internal Revenue Service as a
Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity,
and
iii. is located in any county of the state
regardless of population;
9. All property used exclusively and directly for charitable
purposes within this state, provided the charity using said property
does not pay any rent or remuneration to the owner thereof unless
the owner is a charitable institution described in Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), or a
veterans' organization described in Section 501(c)(19) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(19);
10. All property of any hospital established, organized and
operated by any person, partnership, association, organization,
trust, or corporation, as a nonprofit and charitable hospital,
Req. No. 14705 Page 8

prov ided the property and net income from such hospital are used
directly, solely, and exclusively within this state for charitable
purposes and that no part of such income shall inure to the benefit
of any individual, person, partner, shareholder, or stockholder, and
provided further that such hospital facilities shall be open to the
public without discrimination as to race, color or creed and
regardless of ability to pay, and that such hospital is licensed and
otherwise complies with the laws of this state relating to the
licensing and regulation of hospitals;
11. All libraries and office equipment of ministers of the
Gospel actively engaged in ministerial work in the State of
Oklahoma, where said libraries and office equipment are being used
by said ministers in their ministerial work, shall be deemed to be
used exclusively for religious purposes and are declared to be
within the meaning of the term "religious purposes" as used in
Article X, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of Oklahoma;
12. Household goods, tools, implements and livestock of every
person maintaining a home, not exceeding One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) in value or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in value if
Article X, Section 6 of the Oklahoma Constitution provides for an
exemption in such amount; and in addition thereto, there shall be
exempt from taxation on personal property the further sum of Two
Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to all enlisted and commissioned

Req. No. 14705 Page 9

pers onnel, whether on active duty or honorably discharged, who
served in the Armed Forces of the United States during:
a. the Spanish-American War,
b. the period beginning on April 6, 1917, and ending on
July 2, 1921,
c. the period beginning on December 6, 1941, and ending
on such date as the state of national emergency as
declared by the President of the United States shall
cease to exist, or
d. any other or future period during which a state of
national emergency shall have been or shall be
declared to exist by the Congress or the President of
the United States.
All surviving spouses made so by the death of such enlisted or
commissioned personnel, who are bona fide residents of this state,
shall be entitled to the above additional exemption provided in this
paragraph;
13. Family portraits;
14. All food and fuel provided in kind for the use of the
family not to exceed provisions for one (1) year's time, and all
grain and forage necessary to maintain for one (1) year the
livestock used to provide food for the family. No person from whom
pay is received or expected for board shall be considered a member
of the family within the intent and meaning of this paragraph;
Req. No. 14705 Page 10

15. All growing crops; and
16. All game animals, fowl and reptile, which are not being
grown for food or sale and which are kept exclusively for
propagation or exhibition, in private grounds or public parks in
this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14705 MAH 01/14/26
















Req. No. 14705 Page 11